Washington statutes.
RCW 9.01.160

Application to existing civil rights.

Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect any civil right or remedy existing at the time when it shall take effect, by virtue of the common law or of the provision of any statute.

[ 1909 c 249 s 43; RRS s 2295.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: For "this act," see note following RCW 9.01.120.